Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-347.01
Definite profit;
distribution; net profit; use.

(1) For each type
of pickle card unit marketed in this state, the department shall determine
the following: (a) When a licensed organization sells pickle cards through
pickle card operators, the portion of the definite profit from that pickle
card unit which shall go to the licensed organization, such amount to be not
less than seventy percent of the definite profit from such pickle card unit;
(b) the maximum amount of the definite profit from the sale of a pickle card
unit that a licensed organization may pay a pickle card operator as a commission,
fee, or salary to sell its pickle cards, such amount not to exceed thirty
percent of the definite profit from such pickle card unit; (c) the portion
of the definite profit from the sale of a pickle card unit which may be expended
by a licensed organization for allowable expenses, such amount not to exceed twelve percent of the definite profit from such
pickle card unit; and (d) the portion of the definite profit from the sale
of a pickle card unit which may be utilized by a licensed organization for
payment of the organization's sales agent, such amount to be a portion of
the allowable expenses and not to exceed six percent of the definite
profit from such pickle card unit.

(2) The licensed organization's net profit from the sale of
a pickle card unit shall be used exclusively for a lawful purpose. A licensed
organization shall not donate or promise to donate its net profit or any portion
of the net profit to a recipient outside of its organization as an inducement
for or in exchange for (a) a payment, gift, or other thing of value from the
recipient to any person, organization, or corporation, including, but not
limited to, the licensed organization or any of its members, employees, or
agents, or (b) a pickle card operator's agreement to sell pickle cards on
behalf of the licensed organization.

Laws 1988, LB 1232, § 46;

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 44;

Laws 1995, LB 344, § 19;

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 35;

Laws 2009, LB286, § 3.